New York, session 2025-2026, S1043.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "prison 2 privilege limitation act". 3 § 2. The correction law is amended by adding a new section 628 to read 4 as follows: 5 § 628. Limitation of prison privileges for certain individuals. An 6 individual in a state correctional facility, as defined by subdivision 7 four of section two of this chapter, who has been convicted and is serv- 8 ing a sentence pursuant to section 125.25, 125.26, 125.27, 130.30 and/or 9 130.35 of the penal law, except for the purposes of receiving medical 10 treatment pursuant to section five hundred eight of this chapter, shall 11 not be left in the company of civilians without supervision of a 12 correction officer or law enforcement officer. In no case shall such 13 individual be granted the privilege of wearing civilian clothing. 14 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02771-01-5